District of Columbia statutes.
15-523

Judgment.

If the property referred to in section 15-521 appears to belong to the claimant or to be exempt from the process, judgment shall be entered against the plaintiff for costs, and the property levied upon shall be released. If the property does not appear to belong to the claimant or to be exempt, judgment shall be entered against the claimant or the defendant as the case may be, for costs, including additional costs occasioned by the delay in the execution of the writ.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 531, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 15-523.
1973 Ed., § 15-523.